Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 10. Teacher Education Loan Program.

Sec. 14.43.600.
Findings and intent.

The legislature finds that there is a wide and unacceptable disparity between the distribution of Native teachers and Native students in rural elementary and secondary schools in the state. Many rural schools have virtually no Native teachers and no non-Native students. The undesirable effects of this disparity include the following:

there is a serious weakness in the ability of teaching staffs in rural schools to foster a sense of Native traditions and cultures in the Native students;

many rural students are forced to exist in two entirely separate situations: the essentially traditional atmosphere of many Native homes, and the essentially modern atmosphere of the classroom;

almost no Native students return to rural schools to teach, continuing the imbalance and exacerbating its effects; and

there is an annual turnover of 40 percent among teachers in regional educational attendance areas in the state.

The legislature further finds that existing programs have failed to increase the proportion of Natives teaching in rural schools. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to establish the teacher education loan program to encourage rural high school graduates to return to rural schools as teachers and relieve the conditions described in this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, “regional” was substituted for “rural” in paragraph (a)(4) to correct a manifest error in the original enactment.

In 2001, in accordance with § 45, ch. 85, SLA 2001, in subsection (b), “education loan” was substituted for “scholarship loan.”

Administrative Code. —

For teacher education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 5.

Sec. 14.43.610.
Program established.

There is established the teacher education loan program to provide an incentive for rural high school graduates to pursue teaching careers in rural elementary and secondary schools in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2001, in accordance with § 45, ch. 85, SLA 2001, “education loan” was substituted for “scholarship loan.”

Administrative Code. —

For teacher education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 5.

Sec. 14.43.620.
Teacher education revolving loan fund.

The teacher education revolving loan fund is created for the purpose of making education loans to students selected under AS

14.43.600

—

14.43.700

. The fund consists of money or assets appropriated or transferred to the commission for deposit into the fund, money or assets deposited into the fund by the commission, and earnings on investments of money held in the fund.

[Repealed, § 45 ch 89 SLA 2014.]

The commission may make a new loan under this section only if sufficient money or assets are available in the fund established under (a) of this section. If no new loans are issued in a fiscal year under this subsection, the commission shall use deposits for the year in the succeeding year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1984; am §§ 13, 14 ch 92 SLA 1987; am § 23 ch 43 SLA 1991; am §§ 35, 36, 45 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2001, in accordance with § 45, ch. 85, SLA 2001, “education” was substituted for “scholarship” throughout this section.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, rewrote (a), which read, “There is created a teacher education revolving loan fund. The fund shall be used to make education loans to students selected under AS

14.43.600

—

14.43.700

. Unless the instrument evidencing the teacher education loan has been sold or assigned to the Alaska Student Loan Corporation, repayments of principal and interest on a teacher education loan shall be paid into the teacher education revolving loan fund and shall be used to make new teacher education loans. If estimated funds available are inadequate to fully fund estimated teacher education loans for any fiscal year, additional funding from the general fund may be requested and appropriated for that year.”; repealed (b); added (c).

Sec. 14.43.630.
Administration.

The teacher education loan program shall be administered by the commission in accordance with regulations adopted by the commission. The commission shall

allocate the loan awards available for teacher education loans annually to local school boards giving a preference to rural school districts; and

develop and distribute to the local school boards an application form for teacher education loans; the form must include a requirement that the applicant supply a high school academic transcript and a statement of intent to enter a teaching career at the elementary or secondary school level in the state.

The local school boards shall select the recipients of the teacher education loans according to the criteria in AS

14.43.650

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1984; am § 24 ch 43 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2001, in accordance with § 45, ch. 85, SLA 2001, “education” was substituted for “scholarship” throughout this section.

Administrative Code. —

For teacher education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 5.

Sec. 14.43.640.
Conditions of and limitations on loans.

To the extent that they are not in conflict with the provisions of AS

14.43.600

—

14.43.700

, the provisions of AS

14.43.100

—

14.43.160

are applicable to loans made under AS

14.43.600

—

14.43.700

.

If a borrower meets the conditions provided in (a) of this section and is employed as a teacher in a rural elementary or secondary school, the portion of the loan that shall be paid by the state is the following percentages of the total loan received plus interest up to a total of 100 percent of the total loan:

one year employment, 15 percent;

two years employment, an additional 15 percent;

three years employment, an additional 15 percent;

four years employment, an additional 25 percent;

over four years employment, an additional 30 percent.

A loan may not exceed $7,500 in a school year, exclusive of loan guarantee fees.

Proceeds from a teacher education loan may be used only for undergraduate expenses of books, tuition, required fees, loan guarantee fees, room and board, and the transportation expense for two round trips between the loan recipient’s home and school.

Teacher education loans made to a student may not exceed a total of $37,500.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, a borrower who fails to qualify for loan payment by the state because the borrower is required to reside in an urban area of the state in order to receive medical treatment is still entitled to receive loan payments by the state under (b) of this section if the medical condition for which the borrower is receiving treatment did not exist before the borrower received the teacher education loan and the borrower is employed as a teacher in an urban elementary or secondary school.

The commission shall set the interest rate on a teacher education loan made from the teacher education revolving loan fund established under AS

14.43.620

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1984; am § 15 ch 92 SLA 1987; am §§ 41, 42 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 19 ch 5 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 54 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1998; am § 37 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2001, in accordance with § 45, ch. 85, SLA 2001, “education” was substituted for “scholarship” in subsections (d)-(f).

Cross references. —

For authority of the Alaska Student Loan Corporation to set the interest rate on certain loans made under this section before July 17, 2014, see sec. 46(b), ch. 89, SLA 2014.

Administrative Code. —

For teacher education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, added (g).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 46, ch. 89, SLA 2014 provides that (g) of this section applies to loans made under this section on or after July 17, 2014.

Sec. 14.43.650.
Selection criteria.

To be eligible for a teacher education loan, a student must

be a graduate of a public or private high school in the state, with sufficient credits to be admitted to an accredited college or university;

be enrolled in or show evidence of intent to enroll in a degree program directed at a teaching career at the elementary or secondary school level;

meet the conditions set by the student’s local school board with respect to the district’s requirements for teachers in particular subject areas;

submit to the local school board an application provided by the commission under AS

14.43.630(a)(2)

; an application may be submitted six months before graduation from high school; and

not have a past due child support obligation established by court order or by the child support services agency under AS

25.27.160

—

25.27.220

at the time of application.

A local school board shall award teacher education loans giving a preference to applicants from rural schools who meet the qualifications for a loan and taking into account the applicants’ academic records.

A student may not be awarded a teacher education loan under AS

14.43.600

—

14.43.700

if the student receives a loan under AS

14.43.170

—

14.43.175

for the same period of attendance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 116 SLA 1986; am § 16 ch 92 SLA 1987; am § 25 ch 43 SLA 1991; am § 20 ch 5 SLA 1996; am §§ 34, 35 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2001, in accordance with § 45, ch. 85, SLA 2001, “education” was substituted for “scholarship” in subsections (a) and (b).

In 2004, “child support enforcement division” was changed to ‘child support services agency‘ in (a) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004, and to correct a manifest error.

Administrative Code. —

For teacher education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 5.

Sec. 14.43.700.
Definition.

In
AS

14.43.600

—

14.43.700

, “rural” means a community with a population of 5,500 or less that is not connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks or with a population of 1,500 or less that is connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 105 SLA 1992)